grammars/class.verbs.weighted.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
 rr rd rdd dj bb kk dd djdj
 ng rn rl rr nj
 [N] [V] [NonPst] [PstPerf] [PstImperf] [Irr] [Imp]
 [3pl.3pl] [3pl.3sg] [3pl.2] [3pl.1]
 [3sg.1] [3sg.2] [3sg.3sg] [3sg.3pl]
 [2sg.1] [2sg.3]
 [2pl.1] [2pl.3sg] [2pl.3pl]
 [1pl.2] [1pl.3sg] [1pl.3pl]
 [1sg.2] [1sg.3]
 @R.VALENCE.INTR@ @R.TENSE.NP@
 @P.VALENCE.INTR@ @P.TENSE.NP@
 @R.VALENCE.TRNS@ @R.TENSE.P@
 @P.VALENCE.TRNS@ @P.TENSE.P@
 @P.PERS.T@ @R.PERS.T@
 @P.VALENCE.AUGM@ @R.VALENCE.AUGM@
 @P.TYPE.N@ @R.TYPE.N@
 @P.TYPE.V@ @R.TYPE.V@
 (ku) (rr) (r) (~~)
 [GUESS] 
 [VerbRootGuess]

LEXICON Root
@P.TYPE.V@ TSOPreBase ;

LEXICON PostNominal
@R.TYPE.V@ BPINPreBase ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                     !!
!!   PRONOMINALS                       !!
!!                                     !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON TSOPreBase 
!!   Singular - Intransitives !!
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.P@ SingleIntransPastTSO ;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.NP@ SingleIntransNonPastTSO ;
!!  Dual - Intransitives !!
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.P@ DualIntransPastTSO ;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.NP@ DualIntransNonPastTSO ;
!!  Trial - Intransitives !!
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.P@ TrialIntransPastTSO ;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.NP@ TrialIntransNonPastTSO ;
!!  Plural - Intransitives !!
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.P@ PluralIntransPastTSO ;
@P.VALENCE.INTR@@P.TENSE.NP@ PluralIntransNonPastTSO ; 

!!  Transitives - 3 Single obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast3pObjTSO ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast3pObjTSO ; 
!! Transitives - 3 Dual Obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast3pDualObjTSO ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast3pDualObjTSO ; 
!! Transitives - 3 Plural Obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast3PlObjTSO ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast3PlObjTSO ; 
!! Transitives - 2 Person Obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast2Obj ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast2Obj ; 
!! Transitives - 1 person obj !!
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.P@ TransPast1Obj ; 
@P.VALENCE.TRNS@@P.TENSE.NP@ TransNonPast1Obj ; 

LEXICON SingleIntransPastTSO
[V][1sg.past]:nga^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.627834499628365" ;
[V][2sg.past]:yi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.021829713025271" ;
[V][3sg.past]:0^ DirPreBase  "weight: 3.8945527056453217" ;
[V][3sg.past]:bi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 3.8945527056453217" ;

LEXICON SingleIntransNonPastTSO
[V][1sg.nonpast]:nga^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.466271861113757" ;
[V][2sg.nonpast]:yi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.035609458623289" ;
[V][3sg.nonpast]:ka^ DirPreBase  "weight: 4.343829129153874" ;

LEXICON DualIntransPastTSO
[V][12m.past]:ngar(r)^ DirPreBase  "weight: 9.774270648628951" ;
[V][1ua.excl.past]:ngane^ DirPreBase  "weight: 8.270193251852678" ;
[V][2ua.past]:ngune^ DirPreBase  "weight: 8.595615652287306" ;
[V][3ua.past]:bene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.43909436806459" ;

LEXICON DualIntransNonPastTSO
[V][12m.nonpast]:ngar(r)^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.2652158711103825" ;
[V][1ua.excl.nonpast]:ngane^ DirPreBase  "weight: 8.825190093931806" ;
[V][2ua.nonpast]:ngune^ DirPreBase  "weight: 8.545605231712644" ;
[V][3ua.nonpast]:kabene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 7.810660922474238" ;

LEXICON TrialIntransPastTSO
[V][12ua.past]:kane^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.259177298416953" ;

LEXICON TrialIntransNonPastTSO
[V][12ua.nonpast]:kane^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

LEXICON PluralIntransPastTSO
[V][1pl.excl.past]:ngarri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.640589669823983" ;
[V][1pl.incl.past]:karri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.497125915636775" ;
[V][2pl.past]:ngurri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.557831371757859" ;
[V][3pl.past]:birri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 4.51894777365377" ;

LEXICON PluralIntransNonPastTSO
[V][1pl.excl.nonpast]:ngarri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 7.017430283357309" ;
[V][1pl.incl.nonpast]:karri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.171266853040718" ;
[V][2pl.nonpast]:ngurri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.228319822300832" ;
[V][3pl.nonpast]:kabirri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 4.961070549136699" ;

LEXICON TransPast3pObjTSO
[V][1sg.3sg.past]:nga^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.059682837804808" ;
[V][2sg.3sg.past]:yi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.357911019227119" ;
[V][3sg.3sg.past]:0^ DirPreBase  "weight: 4.614736536860386" ;
[V][3sg.3Hsg.past]:bi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 4.912522135240414" ;
[V][12m.3sg.past]:ngarr^ DirPreBase  "weight: 11.160565009748842" ;
[V][2ua.3sg.past]:ngune^ DirPreBase  "weight: 9.396976417487483" ;
[V][1ua.excl.3sg.past]:ngane^ DirPreBase  "weight: 9.214654860693528" ;
[V][3ua.3sg.past]:bene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 7.202931493068644" ;
[V][12ua.3sg.past]:kane^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[V][1pl.excl.3sg.past]:ngarri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 7.27215186995983" ;
[V][1pl.incl.3sg.past]:karri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 7.430863561114651" ;
[V][2pl.3sg.past]:ngurri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.818230757784032" ;
[V][3pl.3sg.past]:birri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 4.682311416703111" ;

LEXICON TransNonPast3pObjTSO
[V][1sg.3sg.nonpast]:nga^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.237647005175971" ;
[V][2sg.3sg.nonpast]:yi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.962067978483017" ;
[V][3sg.3sg.nonpast]:ka^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.1910052980289105" ;
[V][3sg.3Hsg.nonpast]:kabi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.135588598381929" ;
[V][12m.3sg.nonpast]:ngarr^ DirPreBase  "weight: 10.007885499810456" ;
[V][1ua.excl.3sg.nonpast]:ngane^ DirPreBase  "weight: 9.123683082487803" ;
[V][2ua.3sg.nonpast]:ngune^ DirPreBase  "weight: 8.747631859585931" ;
[V][3ua.3sg.nonpast]:kabene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 8.486416360322314" ;
[V][12ua.3sg.nonpast]:kane^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[V][1pl.excl.3sg.nonpast]:ngarri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.928876886015865" ;
[V][1pl.incl.3sg.nonpast]:karri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.143285172933918" ;
[V][2pl.3sg.nonpast]:ngurri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.025360934113919" ;
[V][3pl.3sg.nonpast]:kabirri^ DirPreBase  "weight: 5.128278468120605" ;

LEXICON TransPast3pDualObjTSO
[V][1sg.3ua.past]:ngabenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 11.342886566542797" ;
[V][2sg.3ua.past]:yibenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 9.486588576177171" ;
[V][3sg.3ua.past]:benbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 7.518602475422657" ;
[V][3sg.3ua.past]:benmene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 7.518602475422657" ;
[V][12m.3ua.past]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[V][3ua.3ua.past]:bindi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.271469800186682" ;
[V][2ua.3ua.past]:ngunebenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 10.119111134920681" ;
[V][2ua.3ua.past]:ngurrbenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 10.119111134920681" ;
[V][1ua.excl.3ua.past]:nganebenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[V][1ua.excl.3ua.past]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[V][12ua.3ua.past]:kanebenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.259177298416953" ;
[V][12ua.3ua.past]:karrbenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.259177298416953" ;
[V][1pl.excl.3ua.past]:ngarribenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[V][1pl.excl.3ua.past]:ngarrbenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
[V][1pl.incl.3ua.past]:karribenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.259177298416953" ;
[V][1pl.incl.3ua.past]:karrbenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 12.259177298416953" ;
[V][2pl.3ua.past]:ngurribenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 10.119111134920681" ;
[V][2pl.3ua.past]:ngurrbenbene^ DirPreBase  "weight: 10.119111134920681" ;
[V][3pl.3ua.past]:bindi^ DirPreBase  "weight: 6.271469800186682" ;

LEXICON NounBase
0:barrarn^ PostNominal ; 
0:berd^ PostNominal ;
0:bim^ PostNominal ;
0:bili^ PostNominal ;
0:birli^ PostNominal ;
0:bo^ PostNominal ;
0:boy^ PostNominal ;                                            ! antbed
0:bodahkenboy^ PostNominal ;
0:bolh^ PostNominal ;
0:bolk^ PostNominal ;
0:bong^ PostNominal ;
0:bule^ PostNominal ;
0:bunj^ PostNominal ;
0:dabu^ PostNominal ;
0:dalk^ PostNominal ;
0:deleng^ PostNominal ;
0:djalk^ PostNominal ;
0:djalkno^ PostNominal ;
0:dolng^ PostNominal ;
0:dule^ PostNominal ;
0:dulk^ PostNominal ;
0:(rr)ulk^ PostNominal ;
0:dung^ PostNominal ;
0:(rr)ung^ PostNominal ;
0:dorrh^ PostNominal ;
0:djorrh^ PostNominal ;
0:djurle^ PostNominal ;
0:djurrk^ PostNominal ;
0:kabo^ PostNominal ;
0:galh^ PostNominal ;
0:galhno^ PostNominal ;
0:kanj^ PostNominal ;
0:kunj^ PostNominal ;                                   ! kangaroo
0:karre^ PostNominal ;
0:kayinj^ PostNominal ;
0:keb^ PostNominal ;                                            ! beak
0:kebmayh^ PostNominal ;                             ! bird's beak
0:korle^ PostNominal ;                                        ! bamboo spear
0:go^ PostNominal ;
0:gono^ PostNominal ;
0:ngolek^ PostNominal ;                                      ! breath
0:kod^ PostNominal ;
0:kole^ PostNominal ;
0:golk^ PostNominal ;
0:karrk^ PostNominal ;
0:korrk^ PostNominal ;
0:kuk^ PostNominal ;
0:kurlah^ PostNominal ;
0:kurlk^ PostNominal ;
0:labbal^ PostNominal ;                                      ! billabong
0:lod^ PostNominal ;
0:madj^ PostNominal ;
0:mala^ PostNominal ;
0:marrwe^ PostNominal ;
0:malayi^ PostNominal ;
0:mayhmayh^ PostNominal ;                                   ! birds
0:me^ PostNominal ;
0:moken^ PostNominal ;
0:mudda^ PostNominal ;
0:ngale^ PostNominal ;
0:ngey^ PostNominal ;
0:bolkngey^ PostNominal ;
0:ngui^ PostNominal ;
0:red^ PostNominal ;
0:rerrng^ PostNominal ;
0:njilk^ PostNominal ;
0:rak^ PostNominal ;
0:rud^ PostNominal ;
0:rurrk^ PostNominal ;
0:wabban^ PostNominal ;
0:wardde^ PostNominal ;
0:wok^ PostNominal ;
0:yahwurd^ PostNominal ;
0:yau^ PostNominal ;
0:yaw^ PostNominal ;
0:yerrng^ PostNominal ;
0:yiwk^ PostNominal ;
